Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.045

Grant awards—Recipients.

In awarding the grants under RCW 28A.175.025, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prioritize schools or districts with dropout rates above the statewide average and shall attempt to award building bridges program grants to different geographic regions of the state. Eligible recipients shall be one of the following entities acting as a lead agency for the local partnership: A school district, a tribal school, an area workforce development council, an educational service district, an accredited institution of higher education, a vocational skills [skill] center, a federally recognized tribe, a community organization, or a nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation. If the recipient is not a school district, at least one school district must be identified within the partnership. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that grants are distributed proportionately between school districts and other recipients. This requirement may be waived if the superintendent of public instruction finds that the quality of the programs or applications from these entities does not warrant the awarding of the grants proportionately.

[ 2007 c 408 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Findings—2007 c 408: See note following RCW 28A.175.025.